Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1845
Commission; duty to organize; rules and regulations; failure; effect.

It shall be the duty of each commission appointed subject to the Civil Service Act to immediately organize and adopt and promulgate procedural rules and regulations, consistent with the purpose of such act, to carry out such act. The failure upon the part of such commission or any individual member to do so shall be a violation of the Civil Service Act and shall be punishable as such.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 20, p. 137;

R.S.1943, § 19-1820;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1820;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 24.

The commission must timely make rules and regulations but absence of such does not prevent discharge for reasons set out in statute. Sailors v. City of Falls City, 190 Neb. 103, 206 N.W.2d 566 (1973).